incubator/apertium-myv-fin/apertium-myv-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON NUM_KUUSI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:si  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:tt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:de N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:te N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:te N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:s N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:s N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:s N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:s N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON Nouns

aika%<n%>:a N_AIKA ; ! "time"
eläin%<n%>:eläi N_ELÄIN ; ! "animal"
ihminen%<n%>:ihmi N_LEIKKIMINEN ; ! "hyman"
ikkuna%<n%>:ikkun N_IKKUNA ; ! "window"
kesäpäivä%<n%>:kesäpäiv N_KOIRA ; ! "summers day"
kissa%<n%>:kiss N_TARHA ; ! "cat"
koira%<n%>:koir N_KOIRA ; ! "dog"
kysymys%<n%>:kysymy N_VASTAUS ; ! "question"
käsi%<n%>:kä N_KÄSI ; ! "hand"
lapsi%<n%>:la N_LAPSI ; ! "child"
laskeminen%<n%>:laskemi N_LEIKKIMINEN ; ! "counting"
leikki%<n%>:leik N_LEIKKI ; ! "play"
leikkiminen%<n%>:leikkimi N_LEIKKIMINEN ; ! "play"
lintu%<n%>:lin N_LINTU ; ! "bird"
pentu%<n%>:pen N_LINTU ; ! "offspring"
piilo%<n%>:piilo N_TALO ; ! "house"
poika%<n%>:po N_POIKA ; ! "boy"
puu%<n%>:pu N_PUU ; ! "tree"
pää%<n%>:pä N_SÄÄ ; ! "tree"
puutarha%<n%>:puutarh N_TARHA ; ! "garden"
pöytä%<n%>:pöy N_PÖYTÄ ; ! "table"
silmä%<n%>:silm N_KOIRA ; ! "eye"
sisko%<n%>:sisko N_TALO ; ! "sister"
pikkusisko%<n%>:pikkusisko N_TALO ; ! "little sister"
sää%<n%>:sä N_SÄÄ ; ! "weather"
talo%<n%>:talo N_TALO ; ! "house"
tyttö%<n%>:tyt N_TYTTÖ ; ! "girl"
tuoli%<n%>:tuol N_TUOLI ; ! "chair
vastaus%<n%>:vastau N_VASTAUS ; ! "answer"
vuosi%<n%>:vuo N_VUOSI ; ! "year"
äiti%<n%>:äi N_ÄITI ; ! "mother"
ääni%<n%>:ään N_ÄÄNI ; ! "voice"
vesi%<n%>:ve N_KÄSI ; ! "water"
vaari%<n%>:vaar N_TUOLI ; ! "grandpa"
matka%<n%>:matk N_TARHA ; ! "distance, travel"

LEXICON Propers

Mari%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Mar PROPN_MARI ;
Marja%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Marj PROPN_MARJA ;
Jaakko%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Jaak PROPN_JAAKKO ;

LEXICON Verbs

ajatella%<vblex%>:ajat V_AJATELLA ; ! "think"
0 V_NEG ; ! "no"
etsiä%<vblex%>:ets V_ETSIÄ ; ! "search"
haluta%<vblex%>:halu V_HALUTA ; ! "want"
istua%<vblex%>:istu V_ISTUA ; ! "sit"
juoda%<vblex%>:j V_JUODA ; ! "eat"
juosta%<vblex%>:juo V_JUOSTA ; ! "run"
katsoa%<vblex%>:katso V_KATSOA ; ! "look"
kertoa%<vblex%>:ker V_KERTOA ; ! "tell"
kuulua%<vblex%>:kuulu V_ISTUA ; ! "belong hear"
kuunnella%<vblex%>:kuun V_AJATELLA ; ! "listen"
kävellä%<vblex%>:kävel V_KÄVELLÄ ; ! "walk"
kylmätä%<vblex%>:kylmä V_HALUTA ; ! "cold"
kysyä%<vblex%>:kysy V_ISTUA ; ! "aks"
laskea%<vblex%>:lask V_LASKEA ; ! "count"
leikkiä%<vblex%>:leik V_LEIKKIÄ ; ! "play"
lopettaa%<vblex%>:lopet V_LOPETTAA ; ! "finish"
löytää%<vblex%>:löy V_LÖYTÄÄ ; ! "find"
lähteä%<vblex%>:lä V_LÄHTEÄ ; ! "go"
huomata%<vblex%>:huoma V_HALUTA ; ! "notice"
tuoda%<vblex%>:t V_JUODA ; ! "bring"
mennä%<vblex%>:men V_MENNÄ ; ! "go"
nukkua%<vblex%>:nuk V_NUKKUA ; ! "sleep"
nauraa%<vblex%>:naur V_NAURAA ; ! "laugh"
nähdä%<vblex%>:nä V_NÄHDÄ ; ! "see"
olla%<vblex%>:0  V_OLLA ; ! "be / have"
osata%<vblex%>:osa V_HALUTA ; ! "know"
puhua%<vblex%>:puhu V_ISTUA ; ! "speak"
pystyä%<vblex%>:pysty V_ISTUA ; ! "can"
pitää%<vblex%>:pi V_LÖYTÄÄ ; ! "like"
saada%<vblex%>:sa V_SAADA ; ! "get"
sanoa%<vblex%>:sano V_KATSOA ; ! "say"
syntyä%<vblex%>:syn V_SYNTYÄ ; ! "be born"
syödä%<vblex%>:s V_SYÖDÄ ; ! "eat"
tehdä%<vblex%>:te V_NÄHDÄ ; ! "do"
tietää%<vblex%>:tie V_TIETÄÄ ; ! "know"
kuulla%<vblex%>:kuul V_TULLA ; ! "come"
tulla%<vblex%>:tul V_TULLA ; ! "come"
täytyä%<vaux%>:täy V_TÄYTYÄ ; ! "must"
vastata%<vblex%>:vasta V_HALUTA ; ! "answer"
voida%<vaux%>:vo V_VOIDA ; ! "can"
yrittää%<vblex%>:yrit V_LOPETTAA ; ! "try"

LEXICON Adjectives

aurinkoinen%<adj%>:aurinkoi A_ILOINEN ; ! "sunny"
hauska%<adj%>:hausk A_VANHA ; ! "fun"
hyvä%<adj%>:0 A_HYVÄ ; ! "good"
iloinen%<adj%>:iloi A_ILOINEN ; ! "happy"
iso%<adj%>:iso A_ISO ; ! "big"
kylmä%<adj%>:kylm A_VANHA ; ! "cold"
lopettanut%<adj%>:lopettan A_LOPETTANUT ; ! "finished"
lämmin%<adj%>:läm A_LÄMMIN ; ! "warm"
pieni%<adj%>:pien A_PIENI ; ! "small"
vanha%<adj%>:vanh A_VANHA ; ! "0ld"

LEXICON Pron

minä%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>:min PRON_MINÄ ;
sinä%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>:sin PRON_MINÄ ; ! "you"
hän%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>:hän PRON_HÄN ; ! "he"
me%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>:me PRON_ME ;
te%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>:te PRON_ME ;
he%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>:he PRON_ME ;
se%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<nt%>:s PRON_SE ; ! "it"
ne%<prn%>:n PRON_NE ;
nämä%<prn%>%<dem%>:nä PRON_NÄMÄ ;
nuo%<prn%>:n PRON_NUO ;
tämä%<prn%>:tä PRON_TÄMÄ ;
tuo%<prn%>:t PRON_TUO ;
missä%<prn%>:missä # ; ! "where"
minne%<prn%>:minne # ; ! "where"
miksi%<prn%>:miksi # ; ! "where"
mitä%<prn%>:mitä # ; ! " "
mitään%<prn%>:mitään # ; ! " "
jotain%<prn%>:jotain # ;
muu%<prn%>:muu # ;
molemmat%<prn%>:molemmat # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions

ja%<cnjcoo%>:ja # ; ! "and"
mutta%<cnjsub%>:mutta # ; ! "but"
tai%<cnjcoo%>:tai # ; ! ""
kun%<cnjsub%>:kun # ; ! ""
että%<cnjsub%>:että # ; ! ""
vaikka%<cnjsub%>:vaikka # ;

LEXICON Adpositions

alta%<pr%>:alta # ; ! "under"
alle%<pr%>:alle # ; ! "under"
alas%<pr%>:alas # ; ! ""
edessä%<pr%>:edessä # ; ! "front"
takaa%<pr%>:takaa # ; ! "behind"
sisällä%<pr%>:sisällä # ; ! "inside"
lähemmäksi%<pr%>:lähemmäksi # ; ! "closer"
lähellä%<pr%>:lähellä # ; ! "close"
luokse%<pr%>:luokse N_CLITS? ; ! "towards"
ulos%<pr%>:ulos # ; ! "out"
läpi%<pr%>:läpi # ; ! "through"
vähän%<pr%>:vähän # ;
kanssa%<pr%>:kanssa # ;
pois%<pr%>:pois # ; ! "away"

LEXICON Adverbs


aina%<adv%>:aina # ; ! ""
eilen%<adv%>:eilen # ; ! ""
ensin%<adv%>:ensin # ; ! ""
huomenna%<adv%>:huomenna # ; ! ""
entä%<adv%>:entä # ; ! ""
erittäin%<adv%>:erittäin # ; ! "very"
hitaasti%<adv%>:hitaasti # ; ! ""
huolellisesti%<adv%>:huolellisesti # ; ! ""
hyvin%<adv%>:hyvin # ; ! ""
kahden%<adv%>:kahden # ; ! ""
kaikkialle%<adv%>:kaikkialle # ; ! ""
koskaan%<adv%>:koskaan # ; ! ""
kovasti%<adv%>:kovasti # ; ! ""
menossa%<adv%>:menossa # ; ! "going"
myös%<adv%>:myös # ; ! "also"
nopeasti%<adv%>:nopeasti  # ; ! "fast"
nyt%<adv%>:nyt # ; ! "now"
siellä%<adv%>:siellä # ; ! ""
silloin%<adv%>:silloin # ; ! ""
sitten%<adv%>:sitten # ; ! "then"
taas%<adv%>:taas # ; ! ""
todennäköisesti%<adv%>:todennäköisesti # ; ! ""
tietenkään%<adv%>:tietenkään # ;  ! ""
tänään%<adv%>:tänään # ; ! "today"
ulkona%<adv%>:ulkona # ; ! "outside"
yhdessä%<adv%>:yhdessä # ; ! "together"
kanssa%<adv%>:kanssa # ; ! "with"
ympärilleen%<adv%>:ympärilleen # ;
niinpä%<adv%>:niinpä # ;
yhä%<adv%>:yhä # ;

LEXICON Numerals
viisi%<num%>:vii NUM_KUUSI ;
kuusi%<num%>:kuu NUM_KUUSI ;
